Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1202.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 72 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 19PAYMENT CARD NETWORK FEE PRACTICESSec.1901. Definitions.1902. Prohibition on certain payment card network fee practices.1903. Penalties.§ 1901. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Acquirer bank." A member of a payment card network that contracts with a merchant for the settlement of electronic payment transactions. The contract may be directly with a merchant or indirectly through a processor to process electronic payment transactions."Consumer." A person who has been issued a credit card or debit card or who purchases goods or services using an electronic payment transaction or another method of payment."Credit card." A card, plate, coupon book or other credit device existing for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor or services on credit."Debit card." A card or other payment code or device issued or approved for use through a payment card network to debit an asset account, notwithstanding the purpose for which the account is established and whether authorization is based on signature, personal identification number or other means. The term includes a general-use prepaid card, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1693l-1 (relating to general-use prepaid cards, gift certificates, and store gift cards). The term does not include a paper check."Electronic payment transaction." A transaction in which a person uses a debit card, credit card or other payment code or device, issued or approved through a payment card network to debit a deposit account or use a line of credit, whether authorization is based on a signature, personal identification number or other means."Fee schedule." A schedule, list, table, chart or similar document or agreement, whether publicly disclosed or not, that provides or fixes the amount, or the formula for determining the amount, of one or more fee rates.20260SB1202PN1476 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Interchange fee." A fee established, charged or received by a payment card network for the purpose of compensating the issuer for its involvement in an electronic payment transaction."Issuer." A person issuing a debit card or credit card or the issuer's agent."Merchant." A person that accepts electronic payment transactions and collects and remits a tax."Payment card network." An entity that meets all of the following:(1) Directly, or through licensed members, processors or agents, provides the proprietary services, infrastructure and software that routes information and data to conduct debit card or credit card transaction authorization, clearance and settlement.(2) A merchant or seller uses in order to accept as a form of payment a brand of debit card, credit card or other device that may be used to carry out debit or credit transactions."Processor." An entity that facilitates, services, processes or manages the debit or credit authorization, billing, transfer, payment procedures or settlement with respect to any electronic payment transaction."Tax." A tax levied on the sale at retail of goods and services under Article II of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.§ 1902. Prohibition on certain payment card network fee practices.(a) Payment card network prohibitions.--A payment card network, whether directly or through an agent, acquirer bank, processor, contract, requirement, condition, penalty, 20260SB1202PN1476 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 technological specification or inducement, may not:(1) establish, charge or put forward on a fee schedule an interchange fee if:(i) the fee is or includes a percentage multiplied by the gross dollar amount of a transaction conducted with a debit card or credit card; and(ii) the fee does not exclude from the gross dollar amount of the transaction any amount attributable to a tax on the transaction;(2) increase the rate or amount of an interchange fee or other fee that applies to the portion of an electronic payment transaction other than the portion attributable to a tax on the transaction in an attempt to, or in a manner that would, circumvent the prohibition provided under paragraph (1);(3) charge a fee to a consumer or merchant related to a disputed electronic payment transaction until the dispute has been resolved by a determination that the consumer or merchant is liable for the transaction and the consumer or merchant has been provided written notice of the determination; or(4) impose a fee or other penalty on a merchant for setting prices in a manner that complies with Federal and State law.(b) Duties of payment card network.--A payment card network shall:(1) Either:(i) deduct the amount of any tax imposed from the calculation of interchange fees specific to each form or type of electronic payment transaction at the time of 20260SB1202PN1476 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 settlement; or(ii) rebate an amount of an interchange fee proportionate to the amount attributable to the tax.(2) If a merchant or seller is unable to capture and transmit tax or fee amounts relevant to the sale at the time of sale, accept proof of tax or fee amounts collected on sales subject to an interchange fee upon the submission of sales data by the merchant or seller and promptly credit the merchant or seller's settlement account.§ 1903. Penalties.(a) Injunctive relief.--The Attorney General may file suit to seek injunctive relief and, if appropriate, to collect a civil penalty and order restitution from any payment card network that the Attorney General believes has violated any provision of this chapter.(b) Civil penalty and refund.--A payment card network that violates this chapter shall:(1) Be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 per violation, payable to the plaintiff.(2) Refund, to each merchant or consumer that utilizes the payment card network, as applicable, the portion of any fee that was collected in violation of this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1202PN1476 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223